World Building Questions

Cross Cutting Concerns

      How does magic impact this?

      How do magical beasts fit in?

      How does magic power come from: the gods, the “mana” of the world (as in Larry Niven’s “Warlock” stories), the personal willpower or life force of the magician, somewhere else?
 

World History

Where did civilization begin?
 What directions did it spread?
 How was its development affected by the presence of magic?
 The presence of non-human races, if any?
 The actions or direct interventions of the gods?

<member>Which peoples/countries/races have traditionally fought, allied, traded, or been rivals?</member>
<member>Where are there still hard feelings about old events?</member>

Which peoples/countries/races have been in conflict in the recent past?
 Why?
 When and why was the most recent war?
 Who won?

Which peoples/etc. are considered the most civilized?
 Which are most technologically advanced?
 Which are most magically advanced?
 Least advanced?
 Why?


Is there a single, generally accepted calendar (including time measurements), or do different countries or peoples or races have different ones?


Specific Country(s) History

How do the weapons of this country compare with those of surrounding cities and countries?
 Have there been recent innovations that may upset the balance of power, or is everyone more or less equal?


How many people are there in this country?
 How does this compare with world population?
 What is considered a small town/large town/city in terms of number of people?

How diverse is the population of this country — how many different races (human or non-human), creeds, etc. normally live in various cities and towns in this country?
 In what percentages?




Is magic legal here?
 All magic, or only some types?
 Do laws vary widely from country to country, or is the attitude generally similar?


Is the relative power of a country or ruler usually measured by the size of the army, the number and ability of his wizards, or the amount of money at his disposal?

Miscellaneous Magic Questions

Which peoples/races/cultures are considered the most civilized?
 Which are most technologically advanced?
 Which are most magically advanced?
 Least advanced?



What are the major political factions at present?
 How long have they been around?
 Which factions are allies, which enemies?
 Are there any potential new forces on the political scene (e.g., a rising middle class, a university gaining unexpected power because of certain magical discoveries, etc.)
Are magicians a force in politics, or are they above it?
 Are there national politics that revolve around magic/wizards (i.e., trying to outlaw, protect, or promote certain kinds of magic, trying to draft wizards into a ruler’s army, licensing of magicians, etc.)?
 Do wizards have a lobby?
 Do they need one?

How much has the presence of magic affected strategy and tactics in general?
 Is magic used primarily for intelligence gathering (spells of invisibility, scrying, etc.), or are there spells that are of use on the battlefield (summoning a demon to attack the enemy, casting fire storms at them, etc.)?
 If battlefield magic is possible, how can it be defended against?

Is healing generally a magical process?
 If so, how does the magical healing talent work?
 Does a magical healer have to consciously direct the healing process (meaning that lots of knowledge of anatomy, etc., would be required), or does magical healing simply speed up the normal, unconscious healing process in the patient?
 Is there more than one kind of magical healer (as there are surgeons, eye doctors, etc.)?
 Are there both magical and non-magical healers, and if so, are they rivals or simply different specialties?

What level is medicine at?
 Who are the healers?
 Do you have to have a talent to heal, or just training?
 Who trains healers, herbalists, apothecaries, surgeons, magical vs. nonmagical healers, etc.?

Is forensic magic possible?
 Commonly used?
 Used only for certain types of crimes (and if so, what)?
 Are the results of forensic spells admissible in court as evidence?
 Is it something any wizard can do, or do you have to specialize?

Are there separate civil and criminal courts?
 Human and non-human courts?
 Is there a separate court or procedure for magical crimes?
 What is different about each type of court?
 Are judges or other court officials required/forbidden to know magic?
 Is evidence obtained by magic acceptable in court?
 Is evidence obtained by magic considered more reliable or less reliable than physical evidence or eyewitness accounts?

Can magic be used in the arts, and if so, how — paint that glows, pictures that move, flutes that play themselves, etc.?
 How do “normal” artists feel about this?
 Is there a separate branch of purely magical art, such as illusion?



Do wild and rebellious young people dress any differently from anyone else?
 Are they allowed to?


Customs

Does the weather or climate contribute any habits or customs, such as the mid-afternoon siesta in hot countries?

Who raises the children?
 At what age do they begin to be educated or trained?
 By whom?
 Are they considered mini-adults?
 Do they dress differently from adults?
 If so, when do they change to adult dress?


What personal weapons are available to anyone who can afford them?
 Are some considered “for nobles only” either by custom or by law?
 Are there laws forbidding certain classes from being armed at all?


Eating

Do men and women, parents and children, servants and master, eat separately, or does everyone eat together?
 How is status displayed at the table (seating above or below the salt, near or far from the head, etc.)?

What dishes are considered holiday food?
 What foods/drinks are associated with particular holidays, events (e.g., funerals, weddings) or times of the year?

What distinguishes a formal, high-court dinner from an ordinary meal, besides quantity and variety of food?
 How do high-court manners differ from everyday ones?

What eating utensils are used, if any?
 Forks, eating knife, spoons, chopsticks?

What is the order of a typical upper-class meal — do they start with wine, then a sweet, then a stew, then a salad, or do they bring everything in at once?

Are special arrangements necessary for entertaining guests of different races/species — taller chairs for dwarves, raw meat for werewolves, perches for harpies, etc.?
 How do the eating customs of different races reflect their cultures and biology?
 How difficult does this make social interaction among the races?

Is sanitation good enough for untreated water to be safe to drink?
 If not, what do people drink instead?

What shapes are tables/eating areas (round, oblong, square, rectangular, etc.)?
 Where is the “place of honor” for a guest?
 Where do the important members of the household sit/recline/whatever?

What things, while edible, are never eaten (what’s not kosher)?
 Why?
 Are some common human foods poisonous to dwarves or elves (or vice versa)?

What types of food or seasoning are characteristic of different races?
 Different cultures?
 Different countries?

Greeting and Meeting



Gestures

When meeting someone, how are they greeted — wave, handshake, bow, some other gesture?
 How did the greeting gesture originate (example: shaking hands to prove one’s weapon hand was empty)?

Are gestures and body language in this society generally subtle or not?
 Do people talk with their hands, or is that considered vulgar?

Is there a way of changing a greeting gesture to make it insulting?

What is a comfortable and polite speaking distance for people in this culture?
 Other cultures/countries/races?
 How aware are people of these differences?

What gestures are insulting?
 What do they mean?
 Do some gestures differ in meaning depending on the culture, race, or time (example: the American “V”-for-victory sign, which became the peace sign, and which is/was highly insulting in Europe)?

How do gestures and body language differ between countries?
 Between species?
 Are there things that don’t matter in one area that are mortal insults in another (eating with the left hand, etc.)?

What are the ways of showing respect (bowing, saluting, etc.)?
 To whom is one expected to show such respect — one’s elders, superiors in rank, teachers, priests, etc.?

Visits

Are there questions that must be asked or avoided (how’s the family, how’s the business, never talk politics or religion, etc.)?
 Are there topics that can only be raised by the host?
 The guest?

How seriously does the culture take the responsibilities of host and guest?
 What rules define when someone becomes a host or guest (e.g., in mid-eastern countries, giving bread and salt to someone makes the person your guest; giving a 5-course meal without bread or salt doesn’t)?

What things are considered courteous to offer a guest: food, reading material, personal guards or attendants, music/entertainment, a person of the opposite sex to sleep with?

What is considered a courteous response to a host’s offer?
 Are there things it is considered rude to accept?
 Rude to turn down?
 Rude to ask for?
 Rude not to ask for?

When a guest arrives, is food or drink offered immediately, after an interval, or only on request?
 Is there a particular food or drink that is customary to offer a newly arrived guest?

How do different eating customs of the various cultures and races interact and conflict?
 Example: a person from a culture that considers it impolite to refuse an offer of food being the guest of someone whose culture considers it impolite to stop offering food until the guest says “when.”
Language

Is there a “trade language” that facilitates commerce between countries that don’t speak the same tongue?
 Is there a “universal language” spoken by educated or noble persons, as Latin was in the Middle Ages?

Are some or all people bilingual?
 Is there a common second language many people know?

Are there “secret” languages or codes known only by priests, soldiers, wizards, guild members, etc.?
 Why were they developed?

What are the variations in speech patterns, syntax, and slang from one social class to another?
 One occupation to another?
 One region to another?
 One race to another?

What areas do local slang phrases come out of?
 (Example: in a fishing town, referring to good luck as “a good catch,” while people in a farming town refer to it as “an unexpected harvest”.) What kinds of colorful turns of phrase do people use?

What things in this culture would their language have many specific words for (e.g., Inuit languages that have 14+ words for different kinds of snow)?
 What do the people in this culture consider important enough to name?
 What does this say about the way they look at the world?

What things would the people of this culture not have a name for, or have one word that covers numerous variations?
 What do they consider too unimportant to name?
 How does this affect the way they see the world?

Are there words that must never be spoken except at particular times, in ceremonies, or under particular circumstances?
 Are there words that must not be spoken in polite company?
 Do these words differ from culture to culture or race to race?

What will people swear a binding oath by?
 What do people use as curse words?

How many languages are there?
 Which ones are related (e.g., the Romance languages) and why?
 Which languages borrow words or phrases from other languages?
 Which is likely to be most widely spoken?

Ethics and Values



<member>Who is considered a citizen, with the rights and privileges thereof?</member>
 <member>What are those rights and privileges (voting, protection from thieves, the right to a hearing in Rome) and what responsibilities go along with them (jury duty, providing funds or knights for the lord’s army?</member>

Are there certain classes of people (wizards, foreigners, children, peasants, women) who have fewer legal rights or less recourse than full citizens?
 Why?
 Are they considered mentally or morally deficient, a danger to the state, or is there some other rationale?

Is there a group of people who do not have full rights in this culture?
 Why not?
 Are they considered mentally or morally deficient, a danger to the state, or is there some other rational?


<member>What are the society’s mores regarding courtship, marriage and family?</member>
 <member>Is marriage primarily a civil or a religious institution?</member>

Who are the persons or groups to which one automatically has a duty simply by being born — one’s family, one’s town/city, one’s country, one’s ruler/president, the gods?
 What is the hierarchy of duty among them — is it considered more noble to follow your mother’s teaching or to follow your emperor’s orders?

What are the standards of beauty for people?
 Paintings and sculpture?
 Clothes and furniture?
 How do they differ from the standards in your culture (example: a country which considers fatness a highly desirable beauty trait)?
 How do standard of beauty reflect the physical traits of the various races (examples: dwarves might consider excessive height unattractive; werewolves might be attracted by long teeth or a particular scent)?

Who are this culture’s historic heroes and villains (e.g., Washington and Lincoln in the U.S.; Henry V in England, etc.)?
 Why are they admired as heroes/villains and what does this say about the people who admire them?

What is the ideal life that people aspire to?
 Do people mostly want to retire to a little house in the country, buy the most “toys,” serve in the army/navy?

What kinds of people are the rebels and outcasts of this society?
 How does society deal with them?
 What actions or ideas will get you made an official outcast/exile?
 What happens to people who don’t fit the accepted social order — do they have their own sections of town, or are they invisible (“in the closet”), or do they get kicked out of the country altogether?

Who are the arbiters of ethics (as opposed to law)?
 How did they get to be arbiters?
 Who are the social arbiters?
 Ditto, ditto.
Which ethical/moral decisions are considered the province of religion, and which are not?

Religion and the Gods

<member>How do various religions, if any, view magic?</member>
 <member>Do any forbid it?</member>
 <member>Why or why not?</member>
 <member>Do any require priests/priestesses to be magicians?</member>
 <member>Do any forbid it?</member>

<member>Are there actual gods/godlike beings?</member>
 <member>If so, do they take an active role in a) the temples, churches, and religions that worship them, or b) the lives of everyday people?</member>
 <member>Why or why not?</member>
 <member>How many gods are there, and is there a hierarchy among them?</member>
 <member>Which ones are good or evil, or is this meaningless when speaking of gods?</member>

How do various religions view non-believers?
 Foreigners?
 Non-humans?
 Which support the state/ruler/government, and which are interested mainly in ordinary people?


Is there tension, rivalry, or outright hostility between any of the actual gods?
 How does this affect church politics?
 People’s everyday lives?

Where does religion fit into this society?
 Is there a state church?
 Is freedom of religion the norm?
 Do people generally think of the temples/churches as parasites or as a useful part of society?

Which ethical/moral decisions are considered the province of religion, and which are not?
 Do the gods care how people behave?
 Why or why not?

If there are actual, demonstrable gods, what part does faith play in their worship?
 What are their various rites like, and why?
 What offerings are considered good, better, best?
 Are people supposed to pick one or more gods to worship and ignore the others, or does everybody officially worship everyone?
 How do people decide whom to worship?
 How do they decide which temple to be affiliated with?

How much of a part do various religions and philosophies play in public and private life?
 Are philosophers and theologians considered ivory-tower academics, or do they debate in the marketplace, like Socrates?
 How much influence do their theories have on the way people actually behave?

Are priests and philosophers full-time workers, or do they need day jobs?
 If they are full-time, who supports them — the congregation, a wealthy patron, the temple’s investment fund, the god they serve?

Why are the gods interested in people?
 Are they like the Greek pantheon (quarrelsome, larger-than-life humans), or are they transcendent and incomprehensible?
 Do the gods have limits to what they can do?
 To what they will do?
 Can the gods make mistakes?

How do the various temples and philosophies explain the classic “problem of evil”?
 Do they think bad things are always a just punishment for some transgression, a character-building exercise, the result of an evil antagonist (Satan, Loki) or just something the gods can’t prevent?

Population

How many people are there in this country?
 How does this compare with world population?
 What is considered a small town/large town/city in terms of number of people?

How diverse is the population of this country — how many different races (human or non-human), creeds, etc. normally live in various cities and towns in this country?
 In what percentages?

Is population shifting from rural to urban, south to north, mountains to coast, etc.?
 Why — invasion, plague, gold rush, job opportunities, etc.?
 What effects has this had on the places being left?
 The places gaining people?

Given the magical/technological level of this society, what is an appropriate ration of farmers or food producers to urban residents?
 If farm production is based on magic, how many urban residents are going to starve if the spells supporting farming (weather, land fertility, etc.) fail suddenly?

Is there much immigration into or out of various countries?
 Why?
 To or from what other areas?

Which geographical areas are most heavily populated?
 Least?
 Are certain areas or terrains more popular with certain races that with others?
 Why

General

Where is scientific and/or magical research done — universities, private labs, under the auspices of the ruler/government, etc.?

Does it require a license to be a wizard?
 If so, is it more like a driver’s license (something nearly everyone in our culture gets upon coming of age) or like a doctor’s license (something only a small percentage of the population will ever get)?
 Who certifies wizards: government, wizard’s guild/AMA, local priests?

What are the various ranks and titles and proper forms of address for the aristocracy/nobility?
 Is everybody “my lord” and “my lady,” or are there more distinctions (your grace, your highness, your majesty, your holiness)?

What occupations are respected?
 Looked down on?
 Why?

How many levels are there in this society: peasant, bourgeoisie, warrior, noble?
 How difficult is it to rise or fall from one social level to another?
 How firm are the divisions between social classes — is it disgraceful for a noble to engage in trade or for a warrior to help with the harvest?

How difficult is it to rise or fall from one social level to another?
 How much social mobility is there?
 How much do people think there is?

What are the standards of beauty for people?
 Paintings and sculpture?
 Clothes and furniture?
 How do they differ from the standards in your culture (example: a country which considers fatness a highly desirable beauty trait)?
 How do standard of beauty reflect the physical traits of the various races (examples: dwarves might consider excessive height unattractive; werewolves might be attracted by long teeth or a particular scent)?

Government

How has the presence of magic and magicians affected law and government?
 Are wizards barred from certain kinds of government jobs or offices?
 Do some government jobs require that their holder be a wizard?

What is the basic style of government: feudal, aristocratic, oligarchy, absolute ruler, democracy, what?
 What forms are used in neighboring countries, and why are they the same or different?

What services does the government or head of state provide: schools, wells, courts, an army to protect people from the Vikings?
 What services are provided locally or privately?

Who has the right to levy taxes?
 For what?
 On what or whom?
 Can taxes be paid in kind, or do certain things require money?

Who provides support services for the head of state?
 What are they called: King’s Counselors, Cabinet Ministers, Secretary of State, Good Ol’ Girls?
 Are they hereditary offices, civil servants, appointees, military, elected?

Is the relative power of a country or ruler usually measured by the size of its army, the number and ability of its wizards, or the amount of money/trade flowing through it?

Who is considered a citizen, with the rights and privileges thereof?
 What are those rights and privileges (voting, protection from thieves, the right to a hearing in Rome) and what responsibilities go along with them (jury duty, providing funds or knights for the lord’s army?

Are there certain classes of people (wizards, foreigners, children, peasants, women) who have fewer legal rights or less recourse than full citizens?
 Why?
 Are they considered mentally or morally deficient, a danger to the state, or is there some other rationale?

What are the easiest/most common ways to advance in status — amass more money, marry well, get the ruler’s eye, etc.?
 How much resistance is there to someone advancing in social status?

Who will take over running the government if the current head of state is incapacitated?
 How is this determined?
 Is there an heir apparent (either actual or political)?
 What happens if the heir is a minor?
 Who gives orders?
 How are they picked?

Who is responsible for protecting the head of state?
 His personal guard, the Secret Service, an elite group affiliated with the regular military?
 What safeguards have they got against assassins, poisoning, direct assault, magical attack?

Who can give orders (to military, to tax collectors, to servants, to ordinary folks on the street)?
 How are such people chosen?

Who is responsible for coinage: the ruler, local barons, someone else (merchant guilds)?
 Are there generally acceptable standards?
 How easy/common is counterfeiting?

Is there an organized system of education?
 If so, who provides it: government, churches, private persons?
 How is it supported?

Who can call up men for an army, and how?
 Does the ruler ask the nobility for men, who in turn draft their peasants, or can the ruler go straight to the bottom?

How much formal spying and intelligence gathering is normally done by governments?
 The military?
 Merchant guilds and wealthy tradesmen?
 Are there actual organizations, or is spying done by diplomats and/or freelance agents?
 How effective is it currently?

Do relations between countries depend mainly on the relations between the heads of state, or can two rulers hate each other’s guts without being able to just declare war and drag their countries into it?

Are there times when people are expected to fast, or feast (e.g., before solstice, after the birth of a child, during Lent or Ramadan, after the death of a ruler, etc.)?
 Are there occasions when the ruler is expected to provide a celebration or spectacle for the people to enjoy, (e.g., the Roman gladiatorial games)?

Politics

Is magic a profession, an art, or just a job?
 What is the status accorded to magicians in this society?
 Are they forbidden overt political action, or are wizards and the wizard’s guild knee-deep in court intrigue?

Are magicians a force in politics, or are they above it?
 Are there national politics that revolve around magic/wizards (i.e., trying to outlaw, protect, or promote certain kinds of magic, trying to draft wizards into a ruler’s army, licensing of magicians, etc.)?
 Do wizards have a lobby?
 Do they need one?

Is there tension, rivalry, or outright hostility between any of the actual gods?
 How does this affect church politics?
 People’s everyday lives?

Does the level of technological advancement match the level of social and political advancement?

Is the relative power of a country or ruler usually measured by the size of its army, the number and ability of its wizards, or the amount of money/trade flowing through it?

What are the easiest/most common ways to advance in status — amass more money, marry well, get the ruler’s eye, etc.?
 How much resistance is there to someone advancing in social status?

What are the major political factions at present?
 How long have they been around?
 Which factions are allies, which enemies?
 Are there any potential new forces on the political scene (e.g., a rising middle class, a university gaining unexpected power because of certain magical discoveries, etc.)
What are the controversial political issues of this day/time/country?
 What positions on these issues are considered conservative?
 Liberal?
 Unthinkable?

How much influence do “special interest groups” such as merchants, wizards, or various religions, have on court politics?
 How do they exercise their influence — indirectly (by talking nobility or council members into taking their sides) or directly (by bribery, coercion, having their own representatives on the council)?

Are there any shaky political alliances between disparate groups?
 Why were they formed?
 How long is it likely to be before they fall apart?
 When they do, what will the effects be?

What ancient rivalries and hatreds still affect current attitudes and political positions (examples: Scottish and Welsh separatist groups; Catholics vs. Protestants vs. Muslims; dwarves vs. elves; Hatfields vs. McCoys)?

What kinds of people are likely to face prejudice: dwarves, werewolves, merchants, women, undertakers?
 Is this institutionalized (i.e., a matter of law) or is it mostly a matter of public attitude?
 Is the ruler powerful enough to defy this prejudice and appoint a dwarf as Chief Councilor or Secretary of Defense and make it work?

Who will take over running the government if the current head of state is incapacitated?
 How is this determined?
 Is there an heir apparent (either actual or political)?
 What happens if the heir is a minor?

Are there people who have great influence on government/politics, but who do not hold any official position?
 Who are they?
 Why do they have influence?
 Is this considered a normal thing, or a bad thing?

Crime and the Legal System


Foreign Relations

Does this country have formal relationships with other countries?
 If so, who can be an ambassador?
 Are there standing embassies and consulates, or are special envoys sent only when something comes up?

How are treaties arranged?
 Are there any significant ones currently in force or coming up for signing?

How much do official attitudes toward other countries affect commerce and trade?
 Do merchants pretty much ignore tensions between government as long as they can make a profit, or will this get them into trouble?
 Are there Customs inspectors or their equivalents at border crossings?
 Is the export/import of some technologies/magics/commodities regulated by the government, or by non-governmental cartels?
 How does this affect political relationships between countries?

How much formal spying and intelligence gathering is normally done by governments?
 The military?
 Merchant guilds and wealthy tradesmen?
 Are there actual organizations, or is spying done by diplomats and/or freelance agents?
 How effective is it currently?

Which countries/races are traditional allies?
 Which are traditional rivals?
 How do these traditions affect present-day relations between countries and races?

Which heads of state are related by blood or marriage, and how important is this in determining foreign policy?

Waging War

Which peoples/countries/races have been in conflict in the recent past?
 Why?
 When and why was the most recent war?
 Who won?
 Who is still mad about that?

What major weapons of war are available (e.g., siege towers, catapults, cannon, A-bombs)?

How much has the presence of magic affected strategy and tactics in general?
 Do army commanders have unusual formations or techniques to deal with various magical attacks?
 How can magic be used as part of a battle plan, given various levels of technology (example: getting a weather magician to make it rain so that enemy cannons will be harder to maneuver in the mud)?

Is magic used primarily for intelligence gathering (spells of invisibility, scrying, etc.), or are there spells that are of use on the battlefield (summoning a demon to attack the enemy, casting fire storms at them, etc.)?
 If battlefield magic is possible, how can it be defended against?

How are armies usually structured?
 Is there a formal, independent command structure, or is everybody officially under the command of whoever brought them to join the ruler’s army, or what?
 If there is a formal structure, what are the various ranks and titles used?

Is weapon usage restricted according to social class, such as only knights being allowed to use sword and armor, yeomen using bows and staffs, peasants using whatever scythes, hammers, etc. are available?
 Are there restrictions, either legal, customary, or biological, on the types of weapons different races or magical beings can use (e.g., elves not being able to wield weapons made of cold iron)?

Are battlefield commissions or knighthoods possible during wartime, or must such promotions wait on formal ceremonies?
 Do normal social restrictions apply during times of war, or is everyone equal on the battlefield?

Who can call up men for an army, and how?
 Does the ruler ask the nobility for men, who in turn draft their peasants, or can the ruler go straight to the bottom?

Are there professional soldiers/mercenaries?
 Is a career in the army possible, or would you have to become a mercenary or sell-sword in order to make a living as a soldier?
 Does the army accept volunteers, or only draftees?
 Can you rise to officer level by displaying courage and merit on the battlefield, or are officer positions reserved for a particular type of person only — people who bought commissions, people who graduated from military school, sons of famous warriors, etc.?

How large is a typical army?
 What percentage of the soldiers in it will be trained (knights, professional soldiers, guards, mercenaries) and what percentage will be untrained recruits?
 Are recruits given training, or are they expected to learn on the job (i.e., in battle)?

How is the army supplied?
 Are soldiers allowed to live off the peasantry, or do they pay for what they take?
 What happens if the supply caravan gets lost or captured?
 How are supplies handled during long campaigns?
 How many days’ worth of supplies can the army haul along with them?
 (Ref. Alexander the Great and the Logistics of the Macedonian Army for the math on how much a horse can carry, how much it needs to eat, etc.)
What are the accepted conventions of making war (e.g., only fight in winter when nobody is busy with crops; don’t make war on civilians; only certain kinds of weapons are available, etc.)?
 Do they differ from race to race?

How does the presence of non-humans (dwarves, vampires, etc.) affect strategy, tactics, and battles generally?
 Are special weapons required if an army is facing certain kinds of non-human armies?
 How could non-human soldiers turn their physical differences from humans to their advantage?

Are particular non-human races traditionally better with certain weapons (e.g., dwarves with axes, elves with bows)?
 Why — because they have greater strength, better eyesight, more manual dexterity, etc.?

Do relations between countries depend mainly on the relations between the heads of state, or can two rulers hate each other’s guts without being able to just declare war and drag their countries into it?

If there’s a long-term war in progress, how has the home front been affected?
 Are people being drafted much younger/older than they used to be?
 Have people been forced to step into nontraditional roles — peasants managing a business, women shoeing horses, children making bullets, etc.?
 How have these changes affected society?
 How will they affect relationships between races/clans/sexes/social classes when the war is over?

Is the army integrated (i.e., men, women, elves, dwarves, purple people, and green ones, all serving together)?
 How does this affect battle formations?
 Strategies?
 Are certain races or groups isolated in particular units?
 If so, are those units considered elite troops or the most expendable soldiers on the battlefield?
 How do these attitudes affect strategy?

Has science or magic been advanced in general by specific developments in the fields of weaponry, tactics, or strategy?

Are there natural or imposed limitations prohibiting the development or use of certain types of weapons (e.g., only muscle-powered weapons because the “laws of physics” in this world don’t allow the combustion of gunpowder)?

To what degree has technology changed the face of war?
 Are there internal combustion engines useable for large troop movements, or steam powered ships?

Weapons

How do the weapons of this country compare with those of surrounding cities and countries?
 Have there been recent innovations that may upset the balance of power, or is everyone more or less equal?

Are magical weapons available?
 Can magic be used in warfare?
 In what ways?
 Are spells fast enough to be useful in hand-to-hand combat, or is magic more of a siege weapon, used only for long, slow things?

How has the presence of magic affected weapons technology?
 Can magic make weapons more effective?
 Do you have to do anything special to walls, armor, or weapons to make them better able to resist enemy spells?

How much has the presence of magic affected strategy and tactics in general?
 Is magic used primarily for intelligence gathering (spells of invisibility, scrying, etc.), or are there spells that are of use on the battlefield (summoning a demon to attack the enemy, casting fire storms at them, etc.)?
 If battlefield magic is possible, how can it be defended against?

How has the presence of magic affected weapons technology?
 Can an ordinary, non-weapon-type object be enchanted to make it extremely lethal (the Frying Pan of Death) or will this work properly only on things that are already weapons?
 Can ordinary objects be enchanted to make them (or their user) supremely good at something (the Frying Pan of Ultimate Gourmet Cooking, the Comb of No Bad Hair Days Ever)?
 How common and useful are such enchantments?

What personal weapons are available to anyone who can afford them?
 Are some considered “for nobles only” either by custom or by law?
 Are there laws forbidding certain classes from being armed at all?

What is the level of weapons technology?
 Are there guns, and if so, how sophisticated (flintlock, matchlock, rifle, Uzi)?

What major weapons of war are available (e.g., siege towers, catapults, cannon, A-bombs)?

What weapons and armor are standard for armies?
 Mercenaries?
 Nobility?
 Your average peasant trying to defend his/her home?

Are weapons, such as swords or pistols, a standard part of dress for any/all segments of society?

What are the accepted conventions of making war (e.g., only fight in winter when nobody is busy with crops; don’t make war on civilians; only certain kinds of weapons are available, etc.)?


Which peoples/countries/races fought, allied, traded, or were traditional rivals?
 Where are there still hard feelings about old events?

Is there a “trade language” that facilitates commerce between countries that don’t speak the same tongue?
 Is there a “universal language” spoken by educated or noble persons, as Latin was in the Middle Ages?

What does this country import?
 Export?
 How important is trade to the economy?
 How is currency exchange handled, and by whom?

Why did people settle in this country in the first place — strategic location, trade route, water transport, minerals, good farming, etc.?

Have things changed much since, or do they still depend on whatever brought them in the first place?

How much do official attitudes toward other countries affect commerce and trade?
 Do merchants pretty much ignore tensions between government as long as they can make a profit, or will this get them into trouble?
 Are there Customs inspectors or their equivalents at border crossings?
 Is the export/import of some technologies/magics/commodities regulated by the government, or by non-governmental cartels?
 How does this affect political relationships between countries?

Business and Industry

How is business organized?
 Are there trade unions?
 Guild structures?
 Multi-state corporations?
 International cartels?

Are people able to cross-craft, I.e., learn or perform different trades?
 Does cross-crafting require guild permission, a write from an overlord, or is it automatically guaranteed by law?
 How strict are craft restrictions — are carpenters the only people allowed to build houses?

What types of trades would be represented in a small town?
 A middle-sized town?
 A large city?

Is currency and coinage standardized, or is there a system of exchange?
 What are typical denominations?
 What types of currency is a traveler or merchant likely to carry on a trip?
 What are different coins called, and what are they worth?

Are industrial processes (e.g., swordmaking, weaving, etc.) considered “trade secrets,” or are they common knowledge?

What is the process a young person goes through to enter a craft or trade?
 An apprenticeship?
 Four years of college?
 Are the craft requirements for various skill ranks (such as apprentice, journeyman, master, or med student, intern, doctor, specialist) standardized, or does rank depend more on the good favor of a master craftsman than it does on skill?

Do different regions/cities specialize in specific crafts, processes, or products (examples: Damascus steel, Bordeaux wines, Chinese silk, Wisconsin cheese)?
 Do different races specialize?

What regulations, if any, has the government/ruler placed on business practices?
 Are there antimonopoly laws?
 Anti-pollution?
 Are there standardized systems of weights and measures, or does a merchant have to specify “a London bushel” of grain rather than “a York bushel”?
 How do differing systems affect shipping and trade?

Are any new industries developing?
 Which old ones do they compete with or make obsolete?

How are records kept — tally sticks, parchment, clay tablets, beads?

Is there a merchant class?
 Where do they fit in society?
 Are there trading guilds?
 If so, how are they organized?
 How much power do they have to control trade?
 How much infighting is there among them?

Are there trading organizations that transcend countries (like the Hanseatic League)?
 How large a presence do they have locally?

Is this a money-based economy, or mostly barter?

What goods are commonly available in small town markets?
 In large towns?
 In cities?
 How do goods get to market?

What industries — mining, fishing, shipbuilding, lumber, farming, manufacturing, etc. — are important, and in which areas?
 Which depend on materials from other areas (as shipbuilding on wood, or weaving on wool)?
 What happens if supplies are disrupted?

Who is responsible for coinage: the ruler, local barons, someone else (merchant guilds)?
 Are there generally acceptable standards?
 How easy/common is counterfeiting?

How much smuggling is there?
 Of what, from or to where?

Transportation and Communication

What are the common domesticated animals used for transportation at various levels of society — e.g., oxen, horses, donkeys, camels, etc.?

Are there magical means of transportation (teleport spells, magic carpets, dragon-riding)?
 How do they compare in speed, safety and expense to non-magical means?
 Are there any drawbacks to magical travel (for example, teleport sickness)?
 How commonly are they used, and for what purposes (industrial shipping vs. travel for fun)?

For traveling short distances within a city, what are the alternatives?
 Can people hire a cab, a litter, a rickshaw, or do they have to walk or rely on their own servants or horses?

How are messages sent when necessary?
 Is there a public/private postal system, or does everyone of importance have to send messengers?
 How fast can news get from A to B?

How available is water transportation?
 How reliable?
 How dangerous?
 How expensive?

How common is travel (for any reason)?
 Does the concept of travel “to see the world” or for fun, even exist?
 How dangerous is travel?
 How large a group is considered safe?
 How much traffic is there inside and outside the main cities?
 Which areas are best/worst?

What is the fastest means of traveling long distances over land?
 Over water?
 Which methods are safest?

What is transportation like?
 Are there good roads?
 Who built them?
 Who is responsible for maintaining them?

Where would a traveler stay at night?
 Are there enough travelers to support inns, or do people have to stay at some equivalent of medieval monasteries?

Are some classes of people (slaves, peasants) not expected to travel at all?
 Are some (heralds, messengers) expected to travel constantly?

How do people find out what is happening in the world — rumor, town crier, newspapers, TV and radio?
 How slanted is the news they get this way, and in what direction?
 Is there freedom of the press?
 If not, who controls/censors it and by what means?

How are books produced?
 Are they common (has the printing press been invented) or are they rare, valuable, expensive, hand-written objects?
 If the latter, who has the time and skill to produce them?

Where are the great libraries or collections of books/scrolls/manuscripts?
 How accessible are they to scholars, wizards, the general public?
 Who supports them?

Science and Technology

Is the level of technology in this society comparable to that of ancient Rome, the Middle Ages, the Renaissance, the Industrial Revolution, what?

What important inventions or advances have been made (the wheel, gunpowder, printing, flush toilets)?
 Have any of them reached the point of affecting the daily life of the average person, or are flush toilets a luxury for the nobility only?

What inventions or advances have not been made that you would normally expect to see at this stage of technological development?
 Which ones are about to be made?

How much is known about the laws of nature, physics, and magic?
 How much of what is commonly known is wrong (e.g., Aristotle’s ideas about human anatomy, which were wrong but accepted for centuries)?

Are the laws of nature and physics actually different in this world, or are they the same as in real life?
 How does magic fit in?
 How do magical beasts fit in?

Where is scientific and/or magical research done — universities, private labs, under the auspices of the ruler/government, etc.?

In what areas might magic replace technology, and thus suppress its development (example: if a spell to keep food cold is easy and cheap, there’s no need to invent refrigerators)?
 In what areas might magic cause more rapid technological or scientific development (example: common use of crystal balls might lead someone to think of inventing the lens or the telescope sooner)?

Medicine

What customs surround death and burial?
 Is there a special class of people (doctors, priests, funeral directors, untouchables) who deal with dead bodies?
 What things must be done and why (burn hair to free spirit, burn body to prevent necromancy, coins on eyes for ferryman, etc.)?
 Are the dead feared, revered, or ignored?

How accurate is the diagnostic process?
 Do healers have ways of telling two diseases with similar symptoms apart?
 Do they depend on standard physical medical tests — reflexes, temperature, contracted pupils — or do they normally use spells for diagnosis?

How expensive is a healer?
 How available are such services to ordinary people?

How much is known about anatomy, physiology, pathology, etc.?
 Are treatments based on purely practical experience (“We know this works but we don’t know why”), or do healers understand at least some of what they are doing?

How much training does a healer normally get?
 Where?
 From whom?

Is healing generally a magical process?
 If so, how does the magical healing talent work?
 Does a magical healer have to consciously direct the healing process (meaning that lots of knowledge of anatomy, etc., would be required), or does magical healing simply speed up the normal, unconscious healing process in the patient?
 Is there more than one kind of magical healer (as there are surgeons, eye doctors, etc.)?
 Are there both magical and non-magical healers, and if so, are they rivals or simply different specialties?

Is there a reliable method of birth control?
 Who normally handles births — midwives or doctors?
 What is the mortality rate for pregnant ladies, new mothers, and children?

What level is medicine at?
 Who are the healers?
 Do you have to have a talent to heal, or just training?
 Who trains healers, herbalists, apothecaries, surgeons, magical vs. nonmagical healers, etc.?

How much need is there for healers — how much sickness, plague, injury, etc. is there in this society?
 Are there enough healers to meet this need?

What kinds of treatments are available — herbal brews, vaccinations, acupuncture, spells, etc.?
 How effective are they?

Is it possible to resurrect/resuscitate someone who has died?
 If so, how long does it take before this becomes impossible?
 Before serious brain damage sets in?

How is insanity treated?
 Are there asylums or treatment centers, or is it handled case-by-case?
 How effective are treatments for insanity?

How much do the physical differences between humans and non-humans affect their medical treatment?
 Are there diseases that only affect non-humans, or only humans?
 Are there diseases that affect everybody, but with different degrees of severity — a mild cold in a human is galloping pneumonia in a dwarf?
 Are some treatments lethal to one species but effective for others?
 Do doctors or healers have to specialize to do a good job of treating non-human patients?

Arts and Entertainment

What is the status of the arts (dance, music, theater, etc.) in this society?
 Are artists revered or mistrusted?
 Are they considered noble or immoral?
 Who supports the arts?
 Which arts are most highly valued and why?

Are there permanent theaters or concert halls for the performing arts?
 If so, who owns and runs them?
 Are they profitable?
 Are there also traveling troupes of players/musicians/dancers?
 How do their performances differ?

What do people at various levels of society do for fun?

Can magic be used in the arts, and if so, how — paint that glows, pictures that move, flutes that play themselves, etc.?
 How do “normal” artists feel about this?
 Is there a separate branch of purely magical art, such as illusion?

What sports or pastimes are common (hawking, hunting, skiing, baseball)?
 Which ones take skill, money, and/or leisure time?

Is magic a profession, an art, or just a job?
 What is the status accorded to magicians in this society?

What games are commonly known — chess, dice, poker?
 Which are common among everyone, and which are limited to the peasantry or nobility?
 Are certain countries/cities known for a passion/expertise for particular games or pastimes?

Have paper-making and the printing press been invented, or are books and scrolls rare, expensive, handwritten items?

What things are considered appropriate subjects for representational arts such as painting and sculpture?
 Which are not?
 (Examples: some cultures/religions forbid the painting or sculpture of the human figure, and have abstract art; some have limited painters to doing only “uplifting” religious works, etc.)
Are there non-human races who tend to be naturally talented painters, dancers, etc.?
 How does this affect human practitioners of these arts?

Do non-human races have their own games and leisure pastimes?
 How do they differ from human games?
 How do they reflect the physiology and/or particular magical talents of the various non-human races?

Are certain races/cultures considered better at some arts than other races/cultures?
 Where do the best dancers, painters, musicians, actors, etc. come from?

What are the standards of beauty for people?
 Paintings and sculpture?
 Clothes and furniture?
 How do they differ from the standards in your culture (example: a country which considers fatness a highly desirable beauty trait)?
 How do standard of beauty reflect the physical traits of the various races (examples: dwarves might consider excessive height unattractive; werewolves might be attracted by long teeth or a particular scent)?

Architecture

What is the most common building material?
 Why is it used (availability, cheapness, legal requirement)?
 Does it have any major drawbacks (e.g., the Great Fire of London)?

How tall a building can be constructed at a reasonable cost and in a reasonable time?

What are typical floor plans like — can people afford to waste space on hallways, or do they just have a series of rooms opening into other rooms?
 Are buildings normally built square, triangular, domed, what?

How many people usually live in a typical house?
 How large is a typical house?

What are the differences in materials and appearance between a lower-class, middle-class, and upper-class type house?
 How do people decorate buildings (e.g., carvings vs. paint vs. patterns resulting from the use of different building materials)?
 Are there differences in ornamentation depending on the purpose of the building (e.g., gargoyles and carvings of saints used mainly on cathedrals)?

Has technology or magic progressed to the point of making window-glass?
 If so, how expensive is it?
 If not, what do people use to cover windows necessary for ventilation and light?

How are living quarters arranged?
 Are bedrooms on the top floors for privacy or on the ground floor for convenience?
 Are parlors or libraries common?
 How are houses heated/cooled?

Are wars and insurrections common enough that castles and cities are built with an eye to military defense first and appearance later, or are palaces and wall-less towns the rule?

Urban Factors

How many people are there in this country?
 How does this compare with world population?
 What is considered a small town/large town/city in terms of number of people?

Is population shifting from rural to urban, south to north, mountains to coast, etc.?
 Why — invasion, plague, gold rush, etc.?
 What effects has this had on the places being left?
 The places gaining people?

Does city layout reflect some philosophy (religious or otherwise), such as that the “head” of the city must be at the center or at the highest point or at the most strategic location?
 Or were layout considerations mainly practical?
 Or did most cities “just grow”?

Are there public or private parks in most/any cities?

Are cities generally laid out on a square-grid system of streets, or do they just grow?
 How wide are the streets and alleys?

What are the landmarks in each city?
 Where are the interesting neighborhoods, like Chinatown or the dwarvish section, and what gives each its special character?
 Do the neighborhoods have names?

Where do people go to shop?
 To eat?
 To have fun?
 To do “touristy” things?
 What sorts of goods/food/entertainment are available in large cities that are not available in the country?

Rural Factors

Is population shifting from rural to urban, south to north, mountains to coast, etc.?
 Why — invasion, plague, gold rush, etc.?
 What effects has this had on the places being left?
 The places gaining people?

Given the magical/technological level of this society, what is an appropriate ration of farmers or food producers to urban residents?
 If farm production is based on magic, how many urban residents are going to starve if the spells supporting farming (weather, land fertility, etc.) fail suddenly?

Are peasants/farmers/yeomen/serfs tied to their land by law or custom, or can they move to town if they feel like it?
 Can they own their farms and property, or is it all “common land,” or is it rented from a lord or landholder?

Given the state of roads and transportation, how much food is it possible to ship to a given location before it spoils?
 (This limits the size of cities.)
Are rural areas primarily farms, forests, fields for grazing, or “waste land”?
 In outlying areas where there aren’t many people, how many roads are there, who builds them, and who maintains them?

How reliable is the weather from year to year — is crop production relatively dependable, or do people have to cope with regular famines due to drought or floods?

What kinds of catastrophic weather are common — tornadoes, hurricanes, blizzards, waterspouts, dust storms?
 How do people cope?
 How do non-humans cope?

How are farming/food-producing areas divided up between humans/nonhumans?
 What kinds of conflicts are likely to result?
 (Example: Expanding human farms encroaching on a forest that dragons or werewolves use for hunting.)
Can peasants/yeomen own their own land, or does it all belong to the lord?
 What kinds of rights over land, crops, game, etc. does a lord/landowner have?
 Is poaching a problem?


    
        

Fantasy Worldbuilding Questions: Daily Life
By Patricia C. Wrede
General

How do ordinary people feel about foreigners?
 Non-humans?
 How ready are they to accept different ideas?
 How cosmopolitan are they?

How much social mobility is there?
 Is it easy or hard for a person born a peasant to advance to the middle class, or a middle class person to the upper class or nobility?
 How much resistance would there be?
 Would such a person ever be accepted socially?

What items or foods or materials are luxuries — chocolate, coffee, silk, spices, flush toilets?
 Why?

What do people generally look like?
 Would a blonde (redhead, brunette) stand out in a crowd?
 Someone 5' 10?
 tall?
 Do non-humans stand out in a crowd, or are there enough of them around that they’re considered ordinary?

What are accepted norms of personal hygiene?
 Do most people bathe regularly, or is bathing considered a health hazard?

How is garbage and other waste material disposed of?

What is furniture like — big and blocky, delicate, simple, elaborately carved, painted?
 What is it mostly made of — cloth, wood, stone?
 Are certain things (like chairs with arms) reserved for high-status individuals?

In what ways does furniture design reflect the customs and lifestyle of the people (example: beds with bed-curtains for privacy in medieval homes where servants wandered through rooms without warning; futons that can be rolled up and put away instead of beds in a country with little house-space)?

What are the plumbing and sanitary systems like?
 Who builds and maintains them?
 How reliable are they, and who do you call when the drains back up?
 How do they differ from city to farm?

How do people cope with various disasters — fire, floods, tornadoes or hurricanes, blizzards, plague, etc.?
 How common are such disasters?

How early do people get up in the morning in the city?
 Country?
 Are clocks common, or do people tell time by the sun or by listening for church bells?

Fashion and Dress

What do people wear?
 How expensive is it?
 Can the material be produced locally, or must some or all of it be imported?

Are weapons a standard part of dress for any/all segments of society?

Are certain clothes customary for certain occupations — e.g., military uniforms, judges robes/wigs, sports teams uniforms, etc.?
 How much variation is allowed — could a scholar wear a day-glow green robe as long as the cut is right, or would that be too much?
 Is it color or style that is most important?

Are the dyes for certain colors — purple, indigo, etc. — rare, making cloth of that color more expensive and/or reserved for nobility or other high-status people?

Are there sumptuary laws, defining who can wear what?
 What are the penalties?
 Who decides when changes are needed?
 How often are they adjusted?

Are there fashions/fads in things besides clothes — styles of carriages, furniture, etc.?

Are there fashions/fads in magic — are herbal spells “in” this year and ritual spells “out,” or vice versa?

How many changes of clothes can a normal person afford?
 A noble person?
 A peasant?

What is the current fashion in clothes?
 Hats?
 Jewelry?
 Shoes?
 Do such fashions differ for humans/non-humans?
 Between city and country?

What materials are appropriate to the climate?
 What materials must be imported, and are therefore for expensive upper-class clothes only?

What things are considered tacky and vulgar, and what things are stylish?

What types of decorations and accessories are common?
 What colors and combinations of colors are thought to look well or to clash?
 Do opinions on this vary from race to race?

What physical types and characteristics are currently fashionable — tan vs. pale skin, the “consumptive look” vs. robust good health, fat vs. thin, blonde vs. brunette, muscles vs. “dead poet”, etc.?

How do non-human fashions reflect their physiology?
 Do dragons dress for dinner?
 Do mermaids have a nudity taboo?

Manners

What distinguishes a formal, high-court dinner from an ordinary meal besides quantity and variety of food?
 How do high-court manners differ from everyday ones?

What are the rules of precedence — who gets to go through doors first?
 Who gets introduced first?

Is there a distinction between “formal” or high court good manners and informal, everyday good manners?
 When and where are people supposed to be on their best behavior?

How important are “good manners” in this society?
 What constitutes everyday good manners?
 How do “good manners” differ from race to race?
 How do people/dwarves/elves/dragons react when someone has just been, by their standards, unspeakably rude?

When a guest arrives, is food or drink offered immediately, after an interval, or only on request?
 Is there a particular food or drink that is customary to offer a newly arrived guest?

Diet

What dishes are considered holiday food?
 What foods/drinks are associated with particular holidays, events (e.g., funerals, weddings) or times of the year?

What distinguishes a formal, high-court dinner from an ordinary meal, besides quantity and variety of food?
 How do high-court manners differ from everyday ones?

When a guest arrives, is food or drink offered immediately, after an interval, or only on request?
 Is there a particular food or drink that is customary to offer a newly arrived guest?
 A guest who is just departing (stirrup cup)?

Is sanitation good enough for untreated water to be safe to drink?
 If not, what do people drink instead?

What things, while edible, are never eaten (what’s not kosher)?
 Why?
 Are some common human foods poisonous to dwarves or elves (or vice versa)?

Given the magical/technological level of this society, what is an appropriate ration of farmers or food producers to urban residents?
 If farm production is based on magic, how many urban residents are going to starve if the spells supporting farming (weather, land fertility, etc.) fail suddenly?

How many meals are considered normal in a day?
 When are they served?
 Which are substantial and which are smaller?
 Are certain foods (e.g., eggs and bacon) reserved mainly for a particular meal?

What dishes or seasonings would be considered typical of this area?
 What wines or beers?

What foods are considered peasant food?
 What foods are staples, commonly eaten every day?
 What foods are rare?
 What foods are normally eaten cooked/raw?

What is the food like?
 What herbs and spices are readily available, and what must be imported?
 How common/expensive are imported foods and spices?

What spices and herbs are produced locally, and which are rare and expensive?
 Which are most commonly used?
 Do people tend to like highly spiced food or not?

How is food preserved for use during the off-season — smoking, canning, salting, drying, etc.?
 How reliable are the methods used — how often does “preserved” food spoil?

When food is in limited supply, who gets first crack?
 The laborers and farmers who have to work to produce more, or the children who are the next generation, or the wise and revered elders, or the nobility?

What foods and seasonings do non-humans like, and how do these differ from those favored by humans?
 Are some foods poisonous or distasteful to one species that are delicacies or necessary to another?

Are there times when people are expected to fast (e.g., before solstice, after the birth of a child, during Lent or Ramadan, after the death of a ruler, etc.)?

Given the state of roads and transportation, how much food is it possible to ship to a given location before it spoils?
 (This limits the size of cities.)
Education

How much does it cost to get various levels of education?

Is there an organized system of education?
 If so, who provides it: government, churches, private persons?
 How is it supported?
 Is magic considered part of the general college curriculum, or do you have to study it privately?

What sort of education is available, and where?
 Are there schoolhouses in every town, or do ordinary people have to travel if they want to be educated?
 Are there universities?
 Private tutors?

What is the level of literacy in the general population?
 Is literacy considered a useful/necessary skill for nobility, or something only scribes/clerks/wimps/bourgeoisie need?
 How common are books?
 How are they produced?

Who are the teachers?
 How are they trained?
 Who pays them?

How much education is considered usual at each of the various levels or classes of society?
 What things are considered absolutely necessary for a gentleman/noble to know?
 A tradesman?

What things are considered absolutely necessary knowledge for a courtier (poetry, languages, skill at arms, etc.)?
 Which are nice but not necessary?
 Which would be highly embarrassing if anybody found out about them (a passion for comic books, etc.)?

How respected are teachers and scholars?
 Who supports them?

If magic requires study, where do you go to learn about it?
 How do people fund their training?
 Is there an apprenticeship system, or are there wizard schools, or is it one-on-one tutoring/mentoring?
 Is an untrained wizard dangerous, or just an ordinary person?

Do wizards have a special language that is used for magic?
 If so, where do they learn it?
 Is it safe to chat in this language, or is everything said in it automatically a spell?
 If so, how can it safely be taught to new students?

Calendar

Is there a single, generally accepted calendar (including time measurements), or do different countries or peoples or races have different ones?

How is the day divided into smaller time units?
 What are they (Hour of the Lark, Sunrise Bell, Nones, etc.)?
 Are the names relevant to anything?
 Is the length of an hour fixed, or does it vary depending on changes in the length of the day as the seasons change?

What are the names of months, and how many days in each?
 How many days in a week?
 Months in a year?
 Are there leap years?
 If so, who keeps track?

Which days are general holidays or festival times?
 What do they celebrate?
 Are there any that are only celebrated in particular countries, cities, or regions?

What event(s) do people use to date years?
 Do they use a single event (the creation of the world, the end of the Great War, the invention of atomic power, etc.) or are events dated based on recurring things (the 12th year of Tiberius’ reign, the 301st year of the Han Dynasty)?

How do people tell what time it is?
 Are there clocks, watches, sundials, etc., or do people have to just listen for bells from the castle or church, or just eyeball the sun?

Are there any days that are considered “outside the year,” like Mardi Gras or the Feast of Fools?
 How are these days customarily observed?
 How did they originate?












y leagues across the plains of V'lsht to reach the lair of the nekromancer Yoxxat, in the heart of the isolated volcano. Muttering a prayer to Benef, god of adventurers, he pressed on. How had he let the president talk him into this?
 Distracted, he did not notice the narrow chasm until it was nearly too late. Only by shooting out a hand and grabbing a stalactite did he avoid a hundred-foot plunge into boiling lava!

So you've decided to design a world. Maybe you're a budding novelist. Perhaps you produce computer games. Most likely, you're a GM running a fantasy role playing game. In any case, you feel you need a setting for your adventurous narrative, be it a planet, a continent, or just a city. This article is addressed primarily to those working in a genre-fantasy context, but science fiction authors are not left out. Fantasy authors are more prone to the pitfalls of the exercise, however, since sci-fi authors are likely to have background knowledge of appropriate fields. The various areas below need not be addressed in the order given. Each writer will have preconceptions about the design process, and the intention here is to inform, not destroy, those ideas.

Geography and geology

Firstly, it's not essential to draw a map in order to create a world, and you may be better off not doing so. Lois McMaster Bujold barely ever provides maps for her novels, leaving the fans to figure it out. Terry Pratchett's famous Discworld was only mapped once well over a dozen novels had been produced, by piecing together assorted references in the books. Secondly, when you do draw a map, draw one which makes sense. While it's entirely acceptable to say that the gods built this or that landform, or that a thing was created by magic, it's not really OK to produce nonsense. The Forgotten Realms world suffers especially from this, partly through being written about by several different authors. One FR novel happily places an artesian well directly above a location where the setting's originator Ed Greenwood had already established there were natural caverns. As these caverns are shown with stalagmites and stalactites, it's a reasonable bet that they're limestone or similar. Artesian wells form where the bedrock is clay. Elsewhere in the same world, a lone volcano is placed in the centre of a large bay at the edge of a continent. J R R Tolkien is nearly as bad, although Karen Wynn Fonstad's Atlas of Middle-Earth tries heroically to make it all fit.

In general, decide what forces govern the geography of your world, and make sure that the topography is consistent with them. If you envision a plate-tectonic composition for your world, work out which mountains are fold mountains and which ones are created by subduction, intrusions or parts of basin and range systems. Rivers flow over impermeable rocks but sink into permeable ones. The directions of ocean currents and prevailing winds are affected by planetary rotation. Mountains affect climate, creating rain shadows. Different kinds of caves are formed in different kinds of rock. Most are incompatible with those terribly dramatic lava flows that fantasy creators love so much. A little leeway is allowable, but someone, sooner or later, will notice if one of your centrepiece locales should have dissolved. Using magic as the explanation for such quirks will wear thin if overused.

Human geography also requires care. During the Roman era in western Europe, planned towns with grid street plans were the norm, as in modern-day America. Similarly, dead straight roads linked towns and forts with little regard to the tribal inhabitants round about. However, from the middle ages until about 1900, towns developed more or less at random or according to convenience. Roads followed contours in the landscape, or curved to take in villages along the route. Towns were built either by rivers, for fresh water and trade, or on hilltops, for defensibility and vision. While it may be aesthetically interesting to make your imperial capital a perfect circle with a radius of three miles, evenly divided into eight memorable districts, it's worth pausing a moment. Is the population growing or shrinking?
 Are the sizes of the districts appropriate to the level of employment in the industries which occupy them?
 What was the area like before the planned city was built?
 If you are seeking an authentically medieval flavour, making things a bit more organic and higgledy-piggledy will help. On another 'human' geography note, why is it that the villains often seem to live in barren, inhospitable terrain, yet command armies vastly superior to those of their plains-dwelling victims?
 Don't bad guys have to worry about supplies?


History and mythology

Just as maps are neither essential nor automatically good, so too with timelines. It may give a pleasing sensation of power to describe events ten millennia before the frame of your main story, or to envisage endless royal lines. But you risk boring the reader or player, and painting yourself into a corner. The history of the real world does not, in the main, consist of heroic struggles against monolithic evil, or the wise reign of stable and beloved dynasties. An examination of the Hundred Years' War, for example, shows that millions of people died, very little permanent gain was achieved by either side, and that the dramatic moments were mainly the product of fluke rather than grand strategy. The Habsburg dynasty, which of all European houses most closely resembles the Numenorean model of Middle Earth, was nevertheless a family like any other, only more in-bred. It had good members and bad ones, high points and low. History is notably short of long-lost heirs reclaiming their thrones, evil empires cast down in ruin, and kings whose rule would stand up to democratic scrutiny. This is not to say a fantasy world cannot have these. They are among the staples of the genre. It would be prudent, though, to be clear that other, more 'regular' historical events occur as well. Otherwise, when the present story gets under way, the central roles of the heroes and villains will be far too obvious, and suspense will be destroyed.

Mythology, likewise, can suffer from being too heavily structured. Anyone wishing to find a real-world pantheon with distinct gods of good, evil, law, and chaos will search in vain. While dualist systems like Zoroastrianism are certainly known, the philosophical complexities dreamed up by Gary Gygax and his ilk are not well-suited to myth-making. Have a read of something like The Golden Bough, and consider for a moment what the feel of a real-world myth is like. By the time the ancient Greeks were writing seriously structured accounts of how the gods came to be, they were simultaneously coming to regard those same gods as little better than fairy stories. Even if the truth of your fantasy theology is based on some hard structure, bear in mind that the peoples who worship the gods or tell the tales will probably not see it that way. Priesthoods of rival deities will not seem very passionate about their faiths if they appear to the reader more like government departments, each promoting their portfolio on behalf of some higher power yet. If you present some philosophical or religious concept of 'the balance' between good and evil, of idealised neutrality, beware of pitfalls. If 'good' must somehow be kept down to maintain the 'balance', then you are undermining the moral idealism of the 'good' faction, and giving validation to the 'evil' side. And if all educated people in the world believe in the 'balance', it will be difficult to depict convincing differences of moral opinion. Seriously powerful beings who serve the ideal of balance can also become the ultimate deus ex machina, guaranteed to reverse any crucial situation at the last moment.

Some writers feel the need to expound their own moral or religious beliefs in the form of fantasy literature. If done in a skilled and sensitive manner, this can be both informative and enjoyable. J R R Tolkien and C S Lewis each did this in their own ways, but all their works are distinctively Christian in character, which does not detract at all from their value as literature. Philip Pullman notably puts an opposed, atheist position in his works. Difficulty arises from this approach when the story and setting become heavy-handed as a consequence. Lewis' The Last Battle is arguably an example of this, and I understand from others that Silver RavenWolf's Teen Witch series, as well as being terribly pulpy, also suffers a lot from proselytising. This may be the reason that the designers of RPG worlds, many of whom are Christians, choose rather amoral polytheistic structures for their games.

Society and sexuality

For anyone living in the modern world, and especially in the 'New World' of America and Australasia, it can be hard to envisage a world whose social structures are radically different. When creating a fantasy world based on medieval Europe, remember that there were no democracies of the modern sort at all. Social mobility was generally limited, especially in rural areas. In areas not dominated by autocratic monarchs or powerful feudal lords, the church or the guilds usually held sway. Even those states which were notionally republics often chose their leaders from a very limited pool with hereditary membership, creating a de facto nobility. Moreover, the modern nation-state did not exist. Different domains could overlap, as where the Norman and Angevin kings of England theoretically owed fealty to the French king for their continental posessions. Borders were fluid, if they existed at all, and many of the better-defined states were tiny, consisting of single cities. Some lords held several domains which were not connected to one another, having married foreign heiresses.

The saying that there is no honour among thieves seems entirely disregarded by many fantasy authors, who choose to depict highly obtrusive thieves' guilds in their cities. In a few rare examples, these guilds are convincing gangs, but all too often the guilds appear stuffed with gentleman jewel-thieves, tarts with hearts, and chirpy street urchins, to the exclusion of any truly threatening criminal element. It's as though the authors have watched the drinking-den scene from Lionel Bart's Oliver! without noting that its main character is subsequently horribly murdered.

One particular social phenomenon deserves a mention. There seems to be something of a fashion in relatively recent fantasy literature of addressing questions of sexuality. Issues ranging from prostitution to homosexuality are presented through the medium of the fictional society. While this may sometimes be apposite, it is best done with care. The real medieval world was neither liberal about sex nor terribly hygenic. While it may be dramatically interesting, not to mention titillating for author and reader, to describe sophisticated and egalitarian cities where sexual experimentation is easy, it can strain the suspension of disbelief. The temple healers must have unlimited power and patience to support such a system, one feels. Conversely, gritty or violent sexual depictions may turn off the reader without enhancing the world created. One particular pitfall to beware of is the creation of idealised same-sex couplings of the opposite sex to yourself. Enough has been written elsewhere about women writers who eroticize gay men for female readers. The converse is perhaps even more likely. Make sure you know what sort of fantasy you are depicting. We can't all be Anne Rice.

Language

Tolkien started the rot. Being a linguistics expert himself, he drew up languages even more readily than maps. Ever since, fantasy authors have felt the need to give their worlds apparent depth by including snippets of non-English tongues. However, not all those who do so are linguists themselves. And even if the characters do not converse in an alien language, place names may be expected to reflect the linguistic traits of the locals. Be very wary of simply throwing together little-used letters like V, K, X, and Z in order to give an exotic feel. Likewise accent-marks and apostrophes. If your readers will not readily grasp what an accent-mark is meant to stand for, leave it out. Lynn Flewelling is notably guilty on this point. There's nothing wrong with using elements of real-world languages. Raymond E Feist's Midkemia features many English- and French-style names, and does just fine. J K Rowling's Harry Potter novels likewise make deft use of European languages. If you must devise a language from whole cloth, be sure to be consistent. Anyone trying to understand the place-names in David Eddings' Belgariad and Malloreon series is asking for headaches. Of course, real-world names can be confusing or inconsistent too, but usually there's a good underlying reason.

It is also goofy and distracting to invent new spellings of existing words simply for effect. 'Magic' was a good enough spelling for previous generations, and if you start using 'majik' instead, you will detract attention from what your magic actually does. Please, please don't call your planet 'Yrth', or any other funky re-spelling of 'Earth'. Take my word for it. Moreover, if you devise languages, make sure they are consistently used. If the heroes need an interpreter to make themselves understood in a particular place, apply this rule consistently. It may be very simple to declare that a 'common tongue' is spoken by everyone in the world, but it's unconvincing. Historically, languages with a wide geographical spread usually, though not always, were understood mainly by specific social classes such as scholars. And where a language was more universally known, it might only exist consistently as a script, or a spoken language, rather than both.

Time and distance

As with languages, maps, and timelines, original calendars are not essential. Tolkien struck a happy balance by detailing the various calendrical systems of Middle Earth in the appendices to the Lord of the Rings, and using the Gregorian calendar in the main text. A natural advantage of this approach is that the reader will not have to flick to the front or back of the book mid-paragraph to find out when the month of Zgkrbh is. Also, while many fantasy authors create new calendars, it's remarkable how many of them nevertheless make a year 365 days and a month 28, plus or minus one in each case. A further habit is to divide the year into 12 months, each as long as a lunar cycle, and assign the remaining days to festivals lying outside months (and usually outside weeks, too). The underlying misconception seems to be that this irons out the mismatch between months and moons, which it doesn't. If you want months to match moons, make the year length evenly divisible by the length of the lunar cycle. Also, having too many days a year that belong to no week will make the weekdays themselves irregular and unmemorable, undermining the idea of a week itself. Better, perhaps, not to devise a calendar at all.

If you've drawn a map, make sure you understand its scale. If you measure everything in leagues, make sure you at least know how long you've decided a league is. Avoid measuring things in kilometres, as the metric system is overtly modern. Also, if your map covers about a twentieth of the planet's surface or more, decide what projection it's meant to be. If you don't know the difference, compare a Mercator projection to an equal area one in a real-world atlas. Also be aware that magical or other means of flight, or clairvoyance, greatly increase the likelihood of accurate maps being available within the setting. As a consequence, characters may well be aware of other continents - so you certainly should be. Too many fantasy worlds cover only single land masses. Ursula le Guin's Earthsea series is a pleasant change, in this as in other respects, from the likes of Middle Earth, Dragonlance, and a zillion and one other one-continent settings. Make your mind up how tall your mountains will be, and check your choice against real examples, for plausibility. Be clear as to how far you think a day's travel is under various conditions, too. Tolkien seems to have changed his mind over this between The Hobbit and the Fellowship of the Ring, when the journey from Bag End to Rivendell takes vastly different lengths of time. This wouldn't be so bad, except that the well-equipped party, travelling openly along the high road, takes much longer than the poorly-equipped fugitives.

Values of measures, such as pounds and feet, not to mention miles, were different in different places. A museum in Bremen, Germany, exhibits whole sets of foot-rules for the measures of different towns and countries. Kalen has pointed out to me that there's no problem with a system which apes the metric system, but has an explanation rooted in the physical dimensions of an old king, or something. This highlights the underlying issue. People often feel comfortable with a system which has grown up or been accepted over time. Even the subtle change from the Julian to Gregorian Calendar attracted a lot of comment at the time, and the French Revolutionary Calendar seems terribly jarring to us because it is forced, and at odds with its surroundings. There is an inevitable fondness for what feels organic and time-worn, and it is often part of the ethos of a traditional fantasy world that this is the case. Of course, if you want the world to feel artificially ordered and constrained, go right ahead and have systematically named months and totally standardised weights and measures.

Technology

The impact of technology on the world is often a key theme in fantasy literature, without being fully developed or understood. In The Hobbit, Tolkien attributes the invention and manufacture of weapons and instruments of torture to the goblins, and develops this theme in The Lord of the Rings with Saruman's agressive industrialism. Yet despite the fact that the villains have much of the industrial might, and the heroes live either in idealised rustic and wilderness settings or in purely defensive fortress-cities, the artefacts of the orcs and goblins appear crude and ill-formed, while the heroes are equipped with fine goods. This is particularly vivid in the film versions, where the Uruk-Hai appear to have swords made of highly brittle pig iron, while Anduril is forged from the shards of Narsil by two skinny elves with the minimum of equipment in a woodland glade. It's difficult to see why Saruman has such muscular and tireless workers, huge fuel supplies, and countless 'gears and wheels', but cannot produce properly forged weapons.

Similarly, other fantasies have the heroes and heroines decked out in highly fashionable fitted boots and breeches which require machinery to produce in advance of the technological setting around them. Again and again, the villains are industrially advanced and powerful, yet produce crude, ugly and ineffective items, while the heroes' homeland is pastoral and idyllic, but able to equip them with finely-tooled weapons and the like. This goes hand-in-hand with the paradox of agriculture. The villains live in wastelands, and have advanced technology, but never seem to consider the option of irrigation. Nor do they need to, since their armies seem not to need to eat. There is often a morally didactic element to such portrayals, as the author's feelings about the applications of technology in their own time and place take precedence over plausibility in the heroes' environment. There is also a reverse fallacy, where an unscientific hero-character, faced with an insurmountable problem, 'invents' a technological solution which is in reality either unworkable or a modern product of scientific research and enquiry. A typical example of this is the ship portage in David Eddings' Belgariad, not to mention various books in which vegetable oil is a high explosive.

Food and drink

It's curious how many fantasy heroes seem to go about their business eating nothing but trail rations, stew, and occasional banquets. The scene with the bowl of stew in the extended DVD version of The Two Towers had strong, and probably deliberate, echoes of the 'stew' entry in Diana Wynne Jones' book The Tough Guide to Fantasyland. When your heroes are in any sort of centre of civilisation, remember that the food can and probably should go beyond stew. Styles of cooking, food taboos, and standards of preparation can vary widely from place to place. Indeed, the heroes may order that reassuring, familiar-sounding stew only to find that the local recipe has hot peppers in it! Some cultures eat horse meat, and others absolutely do not. Even in modern Europe, this can vary over very short distances. Some vegetables are considered animal feed in one place, and culinary essentials in another.

Why not wash down all that fascinating food with a mug or two of the famous dwarven ale?
 Because a traditional ale uses grain, hops, and warm-fermenting yeast, that's why not. I have read far more books with dwarven ale in than ever explain how the dwarves come by these ingredients. Even if you're strictly early medieval, and ignore the hops, it's worth pausing to wonder how you get grain down those mineshafts. Likewise elves who make wine in dense forests. As many noders have pointed out since this article was originally posted, it's quite possible to make beer and wine drinks out of many fruits and crops. This is, of course, the way a skilful writer rationalises these traditional fantasy elements. In doing so, depth is added to the world, as different production techniques are employed by the various peoples.

Closing word

The cardinal rule in all of this is to preserve mimesis - that is, the apparent reality of your world. You don't need to have volumes of abstractions like language and geology if you don't think you'll use them. But a little care can give the reader the pleasing illusion that such things could exist, and that there are no glaring contradictions lurking just below the surface. A little thought about the points mentioned can lead to an altogether more pleasing experience for the player or reader.

With thanks to Swish Girl and mock style, for proofing and advice.


















hese are set of suggested steps if you find yourself with an interested group of players yet the daunting task of cobbling together a believable, consistent environment for them to explore. This can actually be achieved with some properly allotted preparation time (20~25 hrs for your initial set-up and first session).

Seed concept : don't work in isolation ~ truly ingenious constructs are born of conversation and collaboration. Talk with your peeps (players) before beginning in earnest - because you're essentially their director and audience in this potential production. A performance of Antigone with an all Shakespearean troupe would be sadly awkward. Similarly, your elaborate desert campaign is just going to end up disappointing if all your players are serious Celtic enthusiasts. 

Informal brainstorming over coffee or drinks can produce some intriguing foundations ~ best done when most of your potential players are around. If you can evoke a specific parallel time & place, then much of your conceptual groundwork is already established.1


Dense Core vs. Musical Spheres : one difficulty that arises at the outset is the question of where to start - the make up of constellations and moons and planets, or, the temperature and fauna around a local village. Some consistent and all-pervasive historical truths luckily come to your rescue here if you're going for verisimilitude 2 :

first, the vast majority of the world's inhabitants were wicked-poor, illiterate peasants, primarily subsistence farmers or at best artisans, with little or no geographic or historical awareness.


This is particularly true of the Dark & early Middle Ages, when most kings and lords could barely read, and aristocrats rarely travelled outside their realm (as it was simply too dangerous & unprofitable to do so). Real travel for most of medieval Christendom didn't begin until the rise of guilds & universities in the 11-12th c.


Those who did travel, pilgrims and merchant-traders, were the primary sources of rumour and current events. There was no paper, books were useless objects to most, or jealously guarded rarities.


All that last point is a roundabout way of saying, don't elaborately detail every continent and city in your world just so you can begin the game - most people in the Middle Ages were born, lived & died within a 50km radius, never read a single book, and that pretty much made up the borders of their worldly knowledge. Resist the temptation, in other words, to go big. Start Small. 

Tiny Steps: Ever seen a medieval map?
 Lines drawn from one circle to another that represent 'you get to A by going to B' - that was it. No scales, no compasses, no borders, no perspective - this held true until just before the Renaissance. So, make it easy on yourself & your players - map out the wider details as they occur to you. 

That isn't to say ignore all the micro matters: you'll need a local religion or two, some kind of rough calendar, names for a few planets & stars - but this & rough description of a 100km area around their starting point or hometown is really all the players should know about the wider world. Any other knowledge they have would more logically be professional skill or localized information.3


Local Colour: Start with a map (and some strong coffee). Words on paper are good, but reality is spatial, not textual and if you want suspension of disbelief, there has to be a logical, geographically sound element to the surroundings. As mentioned above, if you can nail down the specifics of roughly 100km surrounding the players staring point, you're in good shape for the first little while and the rest will flow from the game; after all, there's nothing quite as frustrating as spending hours on an intricate map of a secluded forest where the players seem to be headed, only to have them change their mind and veer off in another direction. 

As far as mapping goes, best to draw first and name things after the features. Placenames are pretty transient after all, even fluid, but serious landforms are stable referents. What's important in that first map?
 

Scale - otherwise travel times are going to be tough to calculate. If you take an 8.5 x 11 sheet, and make each inch 10m you're be working on roughly the scale mentioned above. 110km may not sound like a lot ~ but it's a solid week of walking ~ so for the first little while it ought to do.


Major landforms - rolling hills, foothills, mountains, valleys, plains, marshes & forests, along with coastline and large islands (if any).


Major rivers & lakes - remember, lakes collect in basins, and rivers run away from high ground to where ever low ground is. Rivers start begin in many branched tributaries, then come together to form larger & larger currents. In other words, the aqua-system of most areas with varied landforms (assuming there's water) should still look like a tree, ending with a trunk river, lake or ocean.


Roads, trails & habitations: where there are sources of water, or waterways, in the Middle Ages, without deep wells or aqueduct expertise, this is where communities found it best to congregate - so villages & towns should probably go where you've drawn lakes or streams. The bigger the lake, river or harbour, usually the larger a city might conceivably grow. Roads were originally built to move armies first, their commercial value was considered secondary - the opposite holds true for water transport.


Local Details : delineate farmland, pastures, wood camps, mills, marshes, bridges, tolls, ruins, fishing ponds - all the little intricacies that make a locality feel like it has depth and history. Then pick the hometown & ratchet up the focus still more by laying down street names, pillories, markets, alleys, wharves, warehouses, guardhouses, taverns, inns, etc.

Economics = Politics : Believe it or not, figuring out where the salt & spices come from, who catches the fish, how the metals get mined and hauled to market, who cuts the wood & other rudimentary economics like that will a) convey a realistic sense of life's business in your setting, b) make it much easier to develop the characters of towns, c) help flesh out the politics, and d) make believable walk-on characters with intelligent motives a lot easier to improvise. A checklist of details to consider:

Imported materials - metals?
 spices?
 salt?
 textiles?
 horses?



Exported goods - fish?
 wood?
 grain?


Movement of goods: Trade routes, caravans, tolls, taxes?


Guilds - how many, how big, how competitive & how powerful?



In terms of political systems themselves - there is a vast spectrum of possibilities -Anarchic, Aristocratic, Autarchic, Authoritarian, Autocratic, Bureaucratic, Capitalist, Collectivist, Colonialist, Commercialism, Communist, Confederates, Constitutional, Constitutional monarchy, Democracy, Despotism, Direct Democratic, Dynastic, Ecclesiastical, Ethnocentric, Expansionist, Fascist, Federalist, Fundamentalist, Gerontocratic, Imperialist, Internationalist, Interventionist, Isolationist, Matriarchy, Meritocracy, Monarchy, Orthodox, Parochialism, Paternalist, Patriarchy, Pluralist, Plutocracy, Police State, Protectionist, Regionalist, Republican, Separatist, Socialist, Theocratic, Totalitarian, Utilitarian, Utopian. Each system experiences different forms of intrigue. Feudalism and other aristocratic forms of governance tend to be subsumed by court intrigues revolving around legacies, dynasties, succession, etc. Republics, on the other hand, obsess over questions of law, rights and public resources. Finally, just as in the real world, a nation might call itself one thing, yet behave quite the opposite. Humans might be treated quite well, but minorities of other races (or the same race), might be subject to entirely different laws, slavery, forced exile, etc. 

) soundtrack: nothing's more important for setting atmosphere, esp. for particularly scenic or cinematic episodes. A list of excellent accompaniment would run a whole other node, i.e. soundtrack to The Mission or Gabriel's Passion, Avro Part & Henryk Gorecki, Eno's early ambient Music for Films or Ambient 4/On Land, any drone like Amp, Scorn, Windy and Carl or Lull (for fright scenes), or Dead Can Dance/Love Spirals Downwards/various ethereal stuff for mystical settings; 


1 Well-document histories on dynamic periods of flux are everywhere (the writings of Marc Bloch, Henri Pirenne & Arnold Toynbee all specialize is the study of disastrous epochs) - and these make excellent role-playing backdrops

The overall magic level is moderately high. Even the most common individual can 
have access to minor magics though not all taken advantage of this. Question to 
ask is how does each culture deal with that?
 I mages and wizards respected 
feared or loved?


Magic items. How common are they?
 Are they all belong to the forerunner and the 
Tor?
 Who made them and when?
 What about magic foci?
 Who uses them?


Magical creatures. Which creatures are magical and how are they magical?


Add a cataclysm or shift in magic that causes the new flow and lay lines that we 
now see with older abandoned ley lines and depleted ley pools. This would happen 
before the latest influx of people from around the world

We have classic sorcery, wizardry, psionic, as well as divine power. The big 
question is how rare is divine intervention 

what effect do spell books have do they exist?


Hedge  wizards or witches and wise women

Spirit callers 

Take a look at how naming is constructed. It is the mages will against the resistance of the object to manipulation.

Remember names has been of a given place. Such as him Fitz Simmons, Jim Smith is a Smith. Or Jim da Warsaw

Keep in mind that while asking to not have 100 words for snow dwarves may have 100 different descriptors for gold and rock

What needs to be done to set mood and setting?
 Light and lively around the edges 
the cities and so on dark and dangerous as you go farther into the center of the 
country

Make decisions about how long the world has been around. What are the non-biology records of change. 
What about erosion?
 Climate changes?
 Floods?
 One or any large big land features I want to include or add.

Look at one for new or ancient roads that exists. Do they follow water lines?


Look seriously at the Mississippi Delta as a cultural Delta much like the Nile. 

Look at racial diversity avoiding the WASP effect. And the men of the Dales white?


What are the contested resources?



Economic several rules who has one, you need to, and how do they get there. If 
people needed and they don't have it they will go get it however they can. And 
this may include manna such as lay lines.

What about sacred cities and locations as resources.

Look at using the mineral resources mapping from the National Geographic service:

Reevaluate and measure the events in the timeline against the mood that I'm aiming for.

And some cultural specific glossaries to flush out the specific areas they pay attention to.

Get clear on who has access to travel via lay lines and who doesn't.

Take a look at education of characters.

Look at where do spirits roam?


Make a list of the magic items and actions that are impossible. What cannot be 
done in this world?
 What are the actions that are now possible that cannot be 
done in the real world.

Once the above has been determined then look at the impact it has on the cultures.


Look at the plot hooks for each story we are doing.











he Bloodlines Thousands of years ago, seven of the Nine Bright Shiners 
sacrificed their powers to create the Charter: a combination of powerful objects 
(the Great Stones and the Wall) and three magic blood lines, known as the 
Abhorsen, the Clayr and the Royal Family. Five of the Seven completely lost 
themselves (one in each object or blood line) while two remained somewhat 
independent. One invested his/her power in the Royal bloodline, one in the 
Abhorsen's and one in the Clayr's (which is why the Clayr greet Sabriel as 
"cousin"). The remaining two, known as the "Wallmakers" invested themselves in 
several objects of power, including the Stones and Wall, then disappeared. These 
artifacts, the Charter Stones, are sources of the web of Charter magic that 
maintains peace and order over the kingdom. The Bloodlines all have a higher 
concentration of strong Charter mages than the general populace.

What are the major political and social groups and each culture and region.

Where do they live. What values they hold dear.

What is a typical town, city, or settlement look like.

Food prep and kitchen areas?

Sanitation and hygiene?


Typical pets?

Heating and cooling of buildings and homes 

Is it legal to wander around?
 Do people care if you come or go?
